Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-221 Prohibited policy provisions:
limiting actions and jurisdictions. (a) No insurance contract delivered
or issued for delivery in this State and covering subjects located, resident or
to be performed in this State, shall contain any condition, stipulation or
agreement:

(1) Requiring it to be construed according to the
laws of any state or country except as necessary to meet the requirements of
the motor vehicle financial responsibility laws or compulsory disability
benefit laws of such other state or country; or

(2) Depriving the courts of this State of the
jurisdiction of action against the insurer; or

(3) Limiting right of action against the insurer to a
period of less than one year from the time when the cause of action accrues in
connection with all insurances other than property and marine and
transportation insurances. In contracts of property insurance, or of marine
and transportation insurance, the limitation shall not be to a period of less
than one year from the date of the loss.

(b) Any such condition, stipulation or
agreement in violation of this section shall be void, but such voiding shall
not affect the validity of the other provisions of the contract. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next